galician.aff
flag *Z:               # "CAT=v,T=inf" #(p,ps)

L E R > -ER,LO    		#"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# valer->vallo
L E R > -R,S			#"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# valer->vales
L E R > -ER,E			#"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# valer->vale
L E R > -R,MOS			#"P=1,N=p,T=p"		# valer->valemos
L E R > -R,DES			#"P=2,N=p,T=p"		# valer->valedes
L E R > -R,N			#"P=3,N=p,T=p"		# valer->valen
L E R > -ER,LA			#"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# valer->valla
L E R > -ER,LAS		#"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# valer->vallas
L E R > -ER,LAMOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# valer->vallamos
L E R > -ER,LADES		#"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# valer->vallades
L E R > -ER,LAN		#"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# valer->vallan

L E R > -ER,É	   						# valer->valé-(lo,la, etc.)

E D I R > -EDIR,IDO    	#"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# pedir->pido
E D I R > -IR,ES		#"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# pedir->pedes
E D I R > -IR,E		#"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# pedir->pede
E D I R > -R,MOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=p"		# pedir->pedimos
E D I R > -R,DES		#"P=2,N=p,T=p"		# pedir->pedides
E D I R > -IR,EN		#"P=3,N=p,T=p"		# pedir->peden
E D I R > -EDIR,IDA		#"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# pedir->pida
E D I R > -EDIR,IDAS	#"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# pedir->pidas
E D I R > -EDIR,IDAMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# pedir->pidamos
E D I R > -EDIR,IDADES	#"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# pedir->pidades
E D I R > -EDIR,IDAN	#"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# pedir->pidan

E G U I R > -EGUIR,IGO    #"P=1,N=s,T=p"	# conseguir->consigo
E G U I R > -IR,ES		 #"P=2,N=s,T=p"	# conseguir->consegues
E G U I R > -IR,E		 #"P=3,N=s,T=p"	# conseguir->consegue
E G U I R > -R,MOS		 #"P=1,N=p,T=p"	# conseguir->conseguimos
E G U I R > -R,DES		 #"P=2,N=p,T=p"	# conseguir->conseguides
E G U I R > -IR,EN		 #"P=3,N=p,T=p"	# conseguir->conseguen
E G U I R > -EGUIR,IGA	 #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# conseguir->consiga
E G U I R > -EGUIR,IGAS	 #"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# conseguir->consigas
E G U I R > -EGUIR,IGAMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# conseguir->consigamos
E G U I R > -EGUIR,IGADES #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# conseguir->consigades
E G U I R > -EGUIR,IGAN	 #"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# conseguir->consigan

E L I R > -ELIR,ILO    	#"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# impelir->impilo
E L I R > -IR,ES		#"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# impelir->impeles
E L I R > -IR,E		#"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# impelir->impele
E L I R > -R,MOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=p"		# impelir->impelimos
E L I R > -R,DES		#"P=2,N=p,T=p"		# impelir->impelides
E L I R > -IR,EN		#"P=3,N=p,T=p"		# impelir->impelen
E L I R > -ELIR,ILA		#"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# impelir->impila
E L I R > -ELIR,ILAS	#"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# impelir->impilas
E L I R > -ELIR,ILAMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# impelir->impilamos
E L I R > -ELIR,ILADES	#"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# impelir->impilades
E L I R > -ELIR,ILAN	#"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# impelir->impilan

E N T I R > -ENTIR,INTO    #"P=1,N=s,T=p"	# mentir->minto
E N T I R > -IR,ES		  #"P=2,N=s,T=p"	# mentir->mentes
E N T I R > -IR,E		  #"P=3,N=s,T=p"	# mentir->mente
E N T I R > -R,MOS		  #"P=1,N=p,T=p"	# mentir->mentimos
E N T I R > -R,DES		  #"P=2,N=p,T=p"	# mentir->mentides
E N T I R > -IR,EN		  #"P=3,N=p,T=p"	# mentir->menten
E N T I R > -ENTIR,INTA	  #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# mentir->minta
E N T I R > -ENTIR,INTAS	  #"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# mentir->mintas
E N T I R > -ENTIR,INTAMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# mentir->mintamos
E N T I R > -ENTIR,INTADES #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# mentir->mintades
E N T I R > -ENTIR,INTAN	  #"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# mentir->mintan

E R I R > -ERIR,IRO    	#"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# ferir->firo
E R I R > -IR,ES		#"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# ferir->feres
E R I R > -IR,E		#"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# ferir->fere
E R I R > -R,MOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=p"		# ferir->ferimos
E R I R > -R,DES		#"P=2,N=p,T=p"		# ferir->ferides
E R I R > -IR,EN		#"P=3,N=p,T=p"		# ferir->feren
E R I R > -ERIR,IRA		#"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# ferir->fira
E R I R > -ERIR,IRAS	#"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# ferir->firas
E R I R > -ERIR,IRAMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# ferir->firamos
E R I R > -ERIR,IRADES	#"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# ferir->firades
E R I R > -ERIR,IRAN	#"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# ferir->firan

E R N I R > -ERNIR,IRNO    #"P=1,N=s,T=p"	# cernir->cirno
E R N I R > -IR,ES		  #"P=2,N=s,T=p"	# cernir->cernes
E R N I R > -IR,E		  #"P=3,N=s,T=p"	# cernir->cerne
E R N I R > -R,MOS		  #"P=1,N=p,T=p"	# cernir->cernimos
E R N I R > -R,DES		  #"P=2,N=p,T=p"	# cernir->cernides
E R N I R > -IR,EN		  #"P=3,N=p,T=p"	# cernir->cernen
E R N I R > -ERNIR,IRNA	  #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# cernir->cirna
E R N I R > -ERNIR,IRNAS	  #"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# cernir->cirnas
E R N I R > -ERNIR,IRNAMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# cernir->cirnamos
E R N I R > -ERNIR,IRNADES #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# cernir->cirnades
E R N I R > -ERNIR,IRNAN	  #"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# cernir->cirnan

E R T I R > -ERTIR,IRTO    #"P=1,N=s,T=p"	# advertir->advirto
E R T I R > -IR,ES		  #"P=2,N=s,T=p"	# advertir->advertes
E R T I R > -IR,E		  #"P=3,N=s,T=p"	# advertir->adverte
E R T I R > -R,MOS		  #"P=1,N=p,T=p"	# advertir->advertimos
E R T I R > -R,DES		  #"P=2,N=p,T=p"	# advertir->advertides
E R T I R > -IR,EN		  #"P=3,N=p,T=p"	# advertir->adverten
E R T I R > -ERTIR,IRTA	  #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# advertir->advirta
E R T I R > -ERTIR,IRTAS	  #"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# advertir->advirtas
E R T I R > -ERTIR,IRTAMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# advertir->advirtamos
E R T I R > -ERTIR,IRTADES #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# advertir->advirtades
E R T I R > -ERTIR,IRTAN	  #"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# advertir->advirtan

E S T I R > -ESTIR,ISTO    #"P=1,N=s,T=p"	# vestir->visto
E S T I R > -IR,ES		  #"P=2,N=s,T=p"	# vestir->vestes
E S T I R > -IR,E		  #"P=3,N=s,T=p"	# vestir->veste
E S T I R > -R,MOS		  #"P=1,N=p,T=p"	# vestir->vestimos
E S T I R > -R,DES		  #"P=2,N=p,T=p"	# vestir->vestides
E S T I R > -IR,EN		  #"P=3,N=p,T=p"	# vestir->vesten
E S T I R > -ESTIR,ISTA	  #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# vestir->vista
E S T I R > -ESTIR,ISTAS	  #"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# vestir->vistas
E S T I R > -ESTIR,ISTAMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# vestir->vistamos
E S T I R > -ESTIR,ISTADES #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# vestir->vistades
E S T I R > -ESTIR,ISTAN	  #"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# vestir->vistan

E T I R > -ETIR,ITO    	#"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# competir->compito
E T I R > -IR,ES		#"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# competir->competes
E T I R > -IR,E		#"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# competir->compete
E T I R > -R,MOS		#"P=1,N=p,T=p"		# competir->competimos
E T I R > -R,DES		#"P=2,N=p,T=p"		# competir->competides
E T I R > -IR,EN		#"P=3,N=p,T=p"		# competir->competen
E T I R > -ETIR,ITA		#"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps"	# competir->compita
E T I R > -ETIR,ITAS	#"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# competir->compitas
E T I R > -ETIR,ITAMOS	#"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# competir->compitamos
E T I R > -ETIR,ITADES	#"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# competir->compitades
E T I R > -ETIR,ITAN	#"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# competir->compitan

O B R I R > -OBRIR,UBRO    #"P=1,N=s,T=p"	# cobrir->cubro
O B R I R > -IR,ES		  #"P=2,N=s,T=p"	# cobrir->cobres
O B R I R > -IR,E		  #"P=3,N=s,T=p"	# cobrir->cobre
O B R I R > -R,MOS		  #"P=1,N=p,T=p"	# cobrir->cobrimos
O B R I R > -R,DES		  #"P=2,N=p,T=p"	# cobrir->cobrides
O B R I R > -IR,EN		  #"P=3,N=p,T=p"	# cobrir->cobren
O B R I R > -OBRIR,UBRA	  #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps" # cobrir->cubra
O B R I R > -OBRIR,UBRAS	  #"P=2,N=s,T=ps"	# cobrir->cubras
O B R I R > -OBRIR,UBRAMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"	# cobrir->cubramos
O B R I R > -OBRIR,UBRADES #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"	# cobrir->cubrades
O B R I R > -OBRIR,UBRAN	  #"P=3,N=p,T=ps"	# cobrir->cubran

O L I R > -OLIR,ULO    #"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# engolir->engulo
O L I R > -IR,ES	   #"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# engolir->engoles
O L I R > -IR,E	   #"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# engolir->engole
O L I R > -R,MOS	   #"P=1,N=p,T=p"		# engolir->engolimos
O L I R > -R,DES	   #"P=2,N=p,T=p"		# engolir->engolides
O L I R > -IR,EN	   #"P=3,N=p,T=p"		# engolir->engolen
O L I R > -OLIR,ULA	   #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps" 	# engolir->engula
O L I R > -OLIR,ULAS   #"P=2,N=s,T=ps"		# engolir->engulas
O L I R > -OLIR,ULAMOS #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"		# engolir->engulamos
O L I R > -OLIR,ULADES #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"		# engolir->engulades
O L I R > -OLIR,ULAN   #"P=3,N=p,T=ps"		# engolir->engulan

U L I R > -IR,O        #"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# bulir->bulo
U L I R > -ULIR,OLES   #"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# bulir->boles
U L I R > -ULIR,OLE	   #"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# bulir->bole
U L I R > -R,MOS	   #"P=1,N=p,T=p"		# bulir->bulimos
U L I R > -R,DES	   #"P=2,N=p,T=p"		# bulir->bulides
U L I R > -ULIR,OLEN   #"P=3,N=p,T=p"		# bulir->bolen
U L I R > -IR,A	   #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps" 	# bulir->bula
U L I R > -IR,AS   	   #"P=2,N=s,T=ps"		# bulir->bulas
U L I R > -IR,AMOS     #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"		# bulir->bulamos
U L I R > -IR,ADES     #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"		# bulir->bulades
U L I R > -IR,AN       #"P=3,N=p,T=ps"		# bulir->bulan

U D I R > -IR,O        #"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# acudir->acudo
U D I R > -UDIR,ODES   #"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# acudir->acodes
U D I R > -UDIR,ODE	   #"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# acudir->acode
U D I R > -R,MOS	   #"P=1,N=p,T=p"		# acudir->acudimos
U D I R > -R,DES	   #"P=2,N=p,T=p"		# acudir->acudides
U D I R > -UDIR,ODEN   #"P=3,N=p,T=p"		# acudir->acoden
U D I R > -IR,A	   #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps" 	# acudir->acuda
U D I R > -IR,AS   	   #"P=2,N=s,T=ps"		# acudir->acudas
U D I R > -IR,AMOS     #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"		# acudir->acudamos
U D I R > -IR,ADES     #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"		# acudir->acudades
U D I R > -IR,AN       #"P=3,N=p,T=ps"		# acudir->acudan

U X I R > -IR,O        #"P=1,N=s,T=p"		# fuxir->fuxo
U X I R > -UXIR,OXES   #"P=2,N=s,T=p"		# fuxir->foxes
U X I R > -UXIR,OXE	   #"P=3,N=s,T=p"		# fuxir->foxe
U X I R > -R,MOS	   #"P=1,N=p,T=p"		# fuxir->fuximos
U X I R > -R,DES	   #"P=2,N=p,T=p"		# fuxir->fuxides
U X I R > -UXIR,OXEN   #"P=3,N=p,T=p"		# fuxir->foxen
U X I R > -IR,A	   #"P=1_3,N=s,T=ps" 	# fuxir->fuxa
U X I R > -IR,AS   	   #"P=2,N=s,T=ps"		# fuxir->fuxas
U X I R > -IR,AMOS     #"P=1,N=p,T=ps"		# fuxir->fuxamos
U X I R > -IR,ADES     #"P=2,N=p,T=ps"		# fuxir->fuxades
U X I R > -IR,AN       #"P=3,N=p,T=ps"		# fuxir->fuxan




#---------------------------------------------
# Verbos irregulares que teñen derivados + agredir e rir (e derivados).
